Utah statutes.
58-55-307.   Confidentiality of records and reports.

(1)  Credit reports, financial statements, and other information submitted to the division by or at the request and direction of an applicant or licensee for the purpose of supporting a representation of financial responsibility constitute protected records under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.

(2)  Notwithstanding Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, the records described in Subsection (1) are not open for public inspection and are not subject to discovery in civil or administrative proceedings.

